Utah statutes.
58-17b-610.   Patients' immediate needs.
This chapter may not be construed to prevent the personal administration of
drugs or medicines by practitioners licensed to prescribe in order to supply
the immediate needs of their patients.  Immediate need for a patient includes
giving out drug samples for up to a three-day supply or the amount necessary
to determine the best pharmaceutical agent for that specific patient.
